Utah statutes.
57-8-28.   Exemption from rules of property.
The rule of property known as the rule against perpetuities and the rule of
property known as the rule restricting unreasonable restraints on alienation
shall not be applied to defeat any of the provisions of this act, or of any
declaration, bylaws or other document executed in accordance with this act.
